Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle B. Voting.

§79-4-7.20.
Shareholders’ list for meeting.

After fixing a record date for a meeting, a corporation shall prepare an alphabetical list of the names of all its shareholders who are entitled to notice of a shareholders’ meeting. The list must be arranged by voting group (and within each voting group by class or series of shares) and show the address of and number of shares held by each shareholder.

The shareholders’ list must be available for inspection by any shareholder beginning two (2) business days after notice of the meeting is given for which the list was prepared and continuing through the meeting, at the corporation’s principal office or at a place identified in the meeting notice in the city where the meeting will be held. A shareholder, his agent or attorney is entitled on written demand to inspect and, subject to the requirements of Section 79-4-16.02(c), to copy the list during regular business hours and at his expense, during the period it is available for inspection.

The corporation shall make the shareholders’ list available at the meeting, and any shareholder, his agent or attorney is entitled to inspect the list at any time during the meeting or any adjournment.

If the corporation refuses to allow a shareholder, his agent or attorney to inspect the shareholders’ list before or at the meeting (or copy the list as permitted by subsection (b)), the chancery court of the county where a corporation’s principal office is located, or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state, on application of the shareholder, may summarily order the inspection or copying at the corporation’s expense and may postpone the meeting for which the list was prepared until the inspection or copying is complete.

Refusal or failure to prepare or make available the shareholders’ list does not affect the validity of action taken at the meeting.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 7.20; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 28, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, in (d), deleted “(or, if none in this state, its registered office)” preceding “is located”, and inserted “or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state” thereafter.

General rights of shareholders to inspect and copy certain corporate records, as not affecting shareholders’ right to inspect records under this section, see § 79-4-16.02.

Who may exercise voting power of corporate stock pending settlement of estate of deceased owner.
7 A.L.R.3d 629.

Right, as between pledgor and pledgee, to vote pledged stock.
68 A.L.R.3d 680.

18 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 23.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 835 et seq., 850.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 644 et seq.

§79-4-7.21.
Voting entitlement of shares.

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) or unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, each outstanding share, regardless of class, is entitled to one (1) vote on each matter voted on at a shareholders’ meeting. Only shares are entitled to vote.

Absent special circumstances, the shares of a corporation are not entitled to vote if they are owned, directly or indirectly, by a second corporation, domestic or foreign, and the first corporation owns, directly or indirectly, a majority of the shares entitled to vote for directors of the second corporation.

Subsection (b) does not limit the power of a corporation to vote any shares, including its own shares, held by it in a fiduciary capacity.

Redeemable shares are not entitled to vote after notice of redemption is mailed to the holders and a sum sufficient to redeem the shares has been deposited with a bank, trust company or other financial institution under an irrevocable obligation to pay the holders the redemption price on surrender of the shares.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 7.21, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Shareholder’s right to appraisal, see § 79-4-13.02.

Court authority is not per se necessary to authorize an executrix with will annexed to exercise the estate’s stock voting rights in a closely held corporation. Harper v. Harper, 491 So. 2d 189, 1986 Miss. LEXIS 2508 (Miss. 1986).

Who may exercise voting power of corporate stock pending settlement of estate of deceased owner.
7 A.L.R.3d 629.

Corporation: validity of charter provision for non-voting common stock.
52 A.L.R.3d 1131.

Right, as between pledgor and pledgee, to vote pledged stock.
68 A.L.R.3d 680.

Right of corporation to discharge employee who asserts right as stockholder.
84 A.L.R.3d 1107.

Validity of variations from one share-one vote rule under modern corporate law.
3 A.L.R.4th 1204.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 858 et seq.,
876 et seq.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:1015 et seq.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 645 et seq.

§79-4-7.22.
Proxies.

A shareholder may vote his shares in person or by proxy.

A shareholder or his agent or attorney-in-fact may appoint a proxy to vote or otherwise act for the shareholder by signing an appointment form or by electronic transmission. An electronic transmission must contain or be accompanied by information from which the recipient can determine the date of the transmission, and that the transmission was authorized by the sender or the sender’s agent or attorney-in-fact.

An appointment of a proxy is effective when a signed appointment form or an electronic transmission of the appointment is received by the inspector of election or the officer or agent of the corporation authorized to tabulate votes. An appointment is valid for eleven (11) months unless a longer period is expressly provided in the appointment.

An appointment of a proxy is revocable unless the appointment form or electronic transmission states that it is irrevocable and the appointment is coupled with an interest. Appointments coupled with an interest include the appointment of:

A pledgee;

A person who purchased or agreed to purchase the shares;

A creditor of the corporation who extended it credit under terms requiring the appointment;

An employee of the corporation whose employment contract requires the appointment; or

A party to a voting agreement created under Section 79-4-7.31.

The death or incapacity of the shareholder appointing a proxy does not affect the right of the corporation to accept the proxy’s authority unless notice of the death or incapacity is received by the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes before the proxy exercises his authority under the appointment.

An appointment made irrevocable under subsection (d) is revoked when the interest with which it is coupled is extinguished.

A transferee for value of shares subject to an irrevocable appointment may revoke the appointment if he did not know of its existence when he acquired the shares and the existence of the irrevocable appointment was not noted conspicuously on the certificate representing the shares or on the information statement for shares without certificates.

Subject to Section 79-4-7.24 and to any express limitation on the proxy’s authority stated in the appointment form or electronic transmission, a corporation is entitled to accept the proxy’s vote or other action as that of the shareholder making the appointment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 7.22; Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 51; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 12, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, rewrote the last sentence in (b).

Corporation accepting or rejecting vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment in accordance with § 79-4-7.24 or this section not liable in damages to shareholder for consequences of acceptance or rejection, see § 79-4-7.24.

Procedure by which beneficial owner of shares registered in name of nominee may be recognized as the shareholder, see § 79-4-23.

Expenses incurred by competing factions within corporation in soliciting proxies as charge against corporation. 51 A.L.R.2d 873.

Corporations: power of inspectors of election relating to irregular or conflicting proxies. 44 A.L.R.3d 1443.

Right, as between pledgor and pledgee, to vote pledged stock, 68 A.L.R.3d 680.

Misrepresentation in proxy solicitation-state cases. 20 A.L.R.4th 1287.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 944 et seq.

6B Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:1681-74:1694.

18 C.J.S., Corporations § 647.

§79-4-7.23.
Shares held by nominees.

A corporation may establish a procedure by which the beneficial owner of shares that are registered in the name of a nominee is recognized by the corporation as the shareholder. The extent of this recognition may be determined in the procedure.

The procedure may set forth:

The types of nominees to which it applies;

The rights or privileges that the corporation recognizes in a beneficial owner;

The manner in which the procedure is selected by the nominee;

The information that must be provided when the procedure is selected;

The period for which selection of the procedure is effective; and

Other aspects of the rights and duties created.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 7.23, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Right, as between pledgor and pledgee, to vote pledged stock.
68 A.L.R.3d 680.

§79-4-7.24.
Corporation’s acceptance of votes.

If the name signed on a vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment corresponds to the name of the shareholder, the corporation, if acting in good faith, is entitled to accept the vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the shareholder.

If the name signed on a vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment does not correspond to the name of its shareholder, the corporation, if acting in good faith, is nevertheless entitled to accept the vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the shareholder if:

The shareholder is an entity and the name signed purports to be that of an officer or agent of the entity;

The name signed purports to be that of an administrator, executor, guardian or conservator representing the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence of fiduciary status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment;

The name signed purports to be that of a receiver or trustee in bankruptcy of the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence of this status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment;

The name signed purports to be that of a pledgee, beneficial owner or attorney-in-fact of the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence acceptable to the corporation of the signatory’s authority to sign for the shareholder has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment;

Two (2) or more persons are the shareholders as cotenants or fiduciaries and the name signed purports to be the name of at least one (1) of the co-owners and the person signing appears to be acting on behalf of all the co-owners.

The corporation is entitled to reject a vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment if the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes, acting in good faith, has reasonable basis for doubt about the validity of the signature on it or about the signatory’s authority to sign for the shareholder.

The corporation and its officer or agent who accepts or rejects a vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment in good faith and in accordance with the standards of this section or Section 79-4-7.22(b) are not liable in damages to the shareholder for the consequences of the acceptance or rejection.

Corporate action based on the acceptance or rejection of a vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment under this section or Section 79-4-7.22(b) is valid unless a court of competent jurisdiction determines otherwise.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 7.24; Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 52, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

Authority of corporation to accept proxy’s vote or other action as that of shareholder making appointment, see § 79-4-7.22.

Right, as between pledgor and pledgee, to vote pledged stock.
68 A.L.R.3d 680.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 846, 859, 864, 911.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 644, 645.

§79-4-7.25.
Quorum and voting requirements for voting groups.

Shares entitled to vote as a separate voting group may take action on a matter at a meeting only if a quorum of those shares exists with respect to that matter. Unless the articles of incorporation or Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq. provide otherwise, a majority of the votes entitled to be cast on the matter by the voting group constitutes a quorum of that voting group for action on that matter.

Once a share is represented for any purpose at a meeting, it is deemed present for quorum purposes for the remainder of the meeting and for any adjournment of that meeting unless a new record date is or must be set for that adjourned meeting.

If a quorum exists, action on a matter (other than the election of directors) by a voting group is approved if the votes cast within the voting group favoring the action exceed the votes cast opposing the action, unless the articles of incorporation or Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq. require a greater number of affirmative votes.

An amendment of articles of incorporation adding, changing or deleting a quorum or voting requirement for a voting group greater than specified in subsection (b) or (c) is governed by Section 79-4-7.27.

The election of directors is governed by Section 79-4-7.28.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 7.25, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Action by single and multiple voting groups, see § 79-4-7.26.

Articles of incorporation may provide for greater quorum or voting requirements for shareholders than provided for by this section, see § 79-4-7.27.

Applicability of this section to adoption of amendments to articles of incorporation, see § 79-4-10.03.

Shareholder’s right to appraisal, see § 79-4-13.02.

Deadlock among shareholders in electing directors as grounds for judicial dissolution of corporation, see § 79-4-14.30.

Who may exercise voting power of corporate stock pending settlement of estate of deceased owner.
7 A.L.R.3d 629.

Duty of pledgee of stocks, bonds or similar securities to protect their value during period of pledge, under UCC § 9-207. 68 A.L.R.3d 657.

Right, as between pledgor and pledgee, to vote pledged stock.
68 A.L.R.3d 680.

Validity of variations from one share-one vote rule under modern corporate law.
3 A.L.R.4th 1204.

Validity, construction, and effect of provision in charter or bylaw requiring supermajority vote. 80 A.L.R.4th 667.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 830 et seq., 840, 841, 850 et seq.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1198, 1200.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 642-644, 650.

§79-4-7.26.
Action by single and multiple voting groups.

If the articles of incorporation or Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq. provide for voting by a single voting group on a matter, action on that matter is taken when voted upon by that voting group as provided in Section 79-4-7.25.

If the articles of incorporation or Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq. provide for voting by two (2) or more voting groups on a matter, action on that matter is taken only when voted upon by each of those voting groups counted separately as provided in Section 79-4-7.25. Action may be taken by one (1) voting group on a matter even though no action is taken by another voting group entitled to vote on the matter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 7.26, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Applicability of this section to adoption of amendments to articles of incorporation, see § 79-4-10.03.

Deadlock among shareholders in electing directors as grounds for judicial dissolution of corporation, see § 79-4-14.30.

Validity of variations from one share-one vote rule under modern corporate law.
3 A.L.R.4th 1204.

Defamation of class or group as actionable by individual member. 52 A.L.R.4th 618.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 854-856, 868-875.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 644, 645.

§79-4-7.27.
Greater quorum or voting requirements.

The articles of incorporation may provide for a greater quorum or voting requirement for shareholders (or voting groups of shareholders) than is provided for by Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq.

An amendment to the articles of incorporation that adds, changes or deletes a greater quorum or voting requirement must meet the same quorum requirement and be adopted by the same vote and voting groups required to take action under the quorum and voting requirements then in effect or proposed to be adopted, whichever is greater.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 7.27, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

General quorum and voting requirements for voting groups, see § 79-4-7.25.

Deadlock among shareholders in electing directors as grounds for judicial dissolution of corporation, see § 79-4-14.30.

Validity of variations from one share-one vote rule under modern corporate law.
3 A.L.R.4th 1204.

Validity, construction, and effect of provision in charter or bylaw requiring supermajority vote. 80 A.L.R.4th 667.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 832, 841.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 642, 643.

§79-4-7.28.
Voting for directors; cumulative voting.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, directors are elected by a plurality of the votes cast by the shares entitled to vote in the election at a meeting at which a quorum is present.

For corporations incorporated before July 1, 2002, shareholders shall have a right to cumulate their votes for directors unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise. For corporations incorporated on or after July 1, 2002, shareholders do not have a right to cumulate their votes for directors unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise.

A statement included in the articles of incorporation that “a designated voting group of shareholders is entitled to cumulate their votes for directors,” or words of similar import, means that the shareholders designated are entitled to multiply the number of votes they are entitled to cast by the number of directors for whom they are entitled to vote and cast the product for a single candidate or distribute the product among two (2) or more candidates.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 7.28; Laws, 1988, ch. 368, § 6; Laws, 2001, ch. 435, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

The 2001 amendment, in (b), inserted “For corporations incorporated before July 1, 2002” in the first sentence, and added the second sentence.

General quorum and voting requirements for voting groups, see § 79-4-7.25.

Articles of incorporation may provide for greater quorum or voting requirements for shareholders than provided for by § 79-4-7.25, see § 79-4-7.27.

Appointment and duties of election inspectors, see § 79-4-7.29.

Shareholder’s right to appraisal, see § 79-4-13.02.

Deadlock among shareholders in electing directors as grounds for judicial dissolution of corporation, see § 79-4-14.30.

Validity of variations from one share-one vote rule under modern corporate law.
3 A.L.R.4th 1204.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1205 et seq.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 645, 646.

§79-4-7.29.
Appointment of election inspectors; duties of inspectors.

A corporation having any shares listed on a national securities exchange or regularly traded in a market maintained by one or more members of a national or affiliated securities association shall, and any other corporation may, appoint one or more inspectors to act at a meeting of shareholders and make a written report of the inspectors’ determinations. Each inspector shall take and sign an oath faithfully to execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of the inspector’s ability.

The inspectors shall:

Ascertain the number of shares outstanding and the voting power of each;

Determine the shares represented at a meeting;

Determine the validity of proxies and ballots;

Count all votes; and

Determine the result.

An inspector may be an officer or employee of the corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 53, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 843 et seq., 911 et seq.